Connecticut, session 2026, SB00467.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsections (b) to (d), inclusive, of section 9-311 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes, as amended by section 92 of public
act 26-1, are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective from passage):
(b) (1) The moderator shall determine the place or places where the
recanvass shall be conducted and, if such recanvass is held before the
tabulators are boxed and collected in the manner required by section 9-
266, the moderator may require that such recanvass of such tabulators
be conducted in each place where the tabulators are located, or the
moderator may require that such tabulators be removed to one central
place where such recanvass shall be conducted. [All recanvassing
procedures shall be open to public observation, subject to the provisions
of subsection (d) of this section.] Such recanvass officials shall, in the
sSB467 / File No. 573 1

sSB467 File No. 573
presence of such moderator and registrars of voters, make a record of
the number on the seal and the number on the protective counter, if one
is provided, on each voting tabulator specified by such moderator. Such
registrars of voters in the presence of such moderator shall turn over the
keys of each such tabulator to such recanvass officials, and such
recanvass officials, in the presence of such registrars of voters and
moderator, shall immediately proceed to recanvass the vote cast
thereon, and shall then open the package of absentee ballots and
recanvass the vote cast thereon. In the course of the recanvass of the
absentee ballot vote the recanvass officials shall check all outer
envelopes for absentee ballots against the inner envelopes for such
ballots and against the registry list to verify postmarks, addresses and
registry list markings and also to determine whether the number of
envelopes from which absentee ballots have been removed is the same
as the number of persons checked as having voted by absentee ballot.
The write-in ballots shall also be recanvassed at this time. Any party
representative present shall have a right to view each ballot as it is being
recanvassed by the recanvass officials, so as to be able to discern the
markings on such ballot. All of the recanvass officials shall use the same
forms for tallies and returns as were used at the original canvass and the
absentee ballot counters shall also sign the tallies.
(2) (A) Subject to the provisions of subsection (d) of this section:
(i) All recanvassing procedures shall be open to public observation
and shall afford members of the public the right to observe such
procedures in person and without the need to so observe through
electronic means;
(ii) The moderator shall not impede the ability of members of the
public to observe such recanvassing procedures; and
(iii) Any moderator who violates the provisions of subparagraph
(A)(i) or (A)(ii) of this subdivision shall be fined not less than one
hundred dollars.
(B) Nothing in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision shall be
sSB467 / File No. 573 2

sSB467 File No. 573
construed to allow any member of the public observing recanvass
procedures pursuant to said subparagraph to interfere with the conduct
of a recanvass.
(c) The votes shall be announced and recorded in the manner
prescribed in section 9-309 on return forms provided by the registrars of
voters and appended thereto shall be a statement signed by the
moderator indicating the time and place of the recanvass and the names,
addresses, titles and party affiliations of the recanvass officials. The
write-in ballots shall be replaced in a properly secured sealed package.
Upon the completion of such recanvass, any tabulator used in such
recanvass shall be locked and sealed, the keys thereof shall immediately
be returned to such registrars of voters and such tabulator shall remain
so locked until the expiration of fourteen days after such election or for
such longer period as is ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.
The absentee ballots shall be replaced in their wrappers and be resealed
by the moderator in the presence of the recanvass officials. Upon the
completion of such recanvass, such moderator and at least two of the
recanvass officials of different political parties shall forthwith prepare
and sign such return forms which shall contain a written statement
giving the result of such recanvass for each tabulator and each package
of absentee ballots whose returns were so recanvassed, setting forth
whether or not the original canvass was correctly made and stating
whether or not the discrepancy still remains unaccounted for. Such
return forms containing such statement shall forthwith be filed by the
moderator in the office of such clerk. If such recanvass reveals that the
original canvass of returns was not correctly made, such return forms
containing such statement so filed with the clerk shall constitute a
corrected return. In the case of a state election, a recanvass return shall
be made in duplicate on a form prescribed and provided by the
Secretary of the State, and the moderator shall file one copy with the
Secretary of the State and one copy with the town clerk not later than
ten days after the election. Such recanvass return shall be substituted for
the original return and shall have the same force and effect as an original
return.
sSB467 / File No. 573 3

sSB467 File No. 573
(d) (1) The moderator may, when any disorder arises that interferes
with the conduct of a recanvass, including any attempt by a person other
than a recanvass official to take part in such recanvass or by such a
person to communicate with a recanvass official, and the offender
refuses to submit to the moderator's lawful authority, order that the
offender be removed by the recanvass officials from such recanvass until
the offender conforms to order or, if need be, until such recanvass is
completed.
(2) Each political party or, in the case of an office subject to recanvass
for which there is more than one candidate from a political party, each
candidate may appoint one representative to communicate directly with
the moderator during a recanvass.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 9-311(b) to (d)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
Subsections (c) and (d) were added for clarity.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB467 / File No. 573 4

sSB467 File No. 573
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Elections Enforcement GF - Potential Minimal Minimal
Commission Revenue Gain
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill: (1) clarifies that recanvasses must be open to in-person
observation; (2) prohibits moderators from impeding public
observation; and (3) establishes a fine of at least $100 for moderators
who violate the provisions of the bill, resulting in a potential minimal
revenue increase to the State Elections Enforcement Commission
(SEEC), beginning in FY 27. The exact revenue will depend on the
number of violations and the value of the fines imposed.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future, subject to the number of violations and the fines
imposed.
sSB467 / File No. 573 5

sSB467 File No. 573
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 467
AN ACT CONCERNING OBSERVATION OF THE CONDUCT OF
ELECTION RECANVASS PROCEDURES.